apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="stigma__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tana</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tanas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="demo__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sar</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sars</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rs</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rna</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarnas</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rnas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="åd/er__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erns</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ror</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rors</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rorna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rornas</l>    <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tevatt/en__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nets</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="exam/en__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vån__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="realexamen">      <i>realexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="noll">            <i>noll</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mogenhetsexamen"> <i>mogenhetsexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gäcken">          <i>gäcken</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dato">            <i>dato</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nelson">          <i>nelson</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="doktorsexamen">   <i>doktorsexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ekonomexamen">    <i>ekonomexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="en-tous-cas">     <i>en-tous-cas</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tentamen">        <i>tentam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sidotema">        <i>sidotema</i><par n="stigma__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="höger">           <i>höger</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="huvudtema">       <i>huvudtema</i><par n="stigma__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tji">             <i>tji</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vån">             <i>vån</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hejd">            <i>hejd</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skepparexamen">   <i>skepparexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="topspin">         <i>topspin</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="demo">            <i>demo</i><par n="demo__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="uppsjö">          <i>uppsjö</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="examen">          <i>exam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="interferens">     <i>interferens</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="motvärn">         <i>motvärn</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sångtema">        <i>sångtema</i><par n="stigma__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ämbetsexamen">    <i>ämbetsexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="high-tech">       <i>high-tech</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nordanskog">      <i>nordanskog</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stigma">          <i>stigma</i><par n="stigma__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="lues">            <i>lues</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hoper">           <i>hoper</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="f">               <i>f</i><par n="f__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="studentexamen">   <i>studentexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="återvändo">       <i>återvändo</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sicksack">        <i>sicksack</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="avkall">          <i>avkall</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="styrbord">        <i>styrbord</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pojk">            <i>pojk</i><par n="vån__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="abiturientexamen"><i>abiturientexam</i><par n="exam/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="åder">            <i>åd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pulsåder">        <i>pulsåd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="källåder">        <i>källåd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="blodåder">        <i>blodåd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mjölkåder">       <i>mjölkåd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lungpulsåder">    <i>lungpulsåd</i><par n="åd/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="rosenvatten">     <i>rosenvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="emservatten">     <i>emservatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="vigvatten">       <i>vigvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="brackvatten">     <i>brackvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="seltersvatten">   <i>seltersvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="marvatten">       <i>marvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kalkvatten">      <i>kalkvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kylvatten">       <i>kylvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="eldvatten">       <i>eldvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mjukvatten">      <i>mjukvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dödvatten">       <i>dödvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="matarvatten">     <i>matarvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kylarvatten">     <i>kylarvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kölvatten">       <i>kölvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sockervatten">    <i>sockervatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="bittervatten">    <i>bittervatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tevatten">        <i>tevatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="gödselvatten">    <i>gödselvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="blyvatten">       <i>blyvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kristallvatten">  <i>kristallvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mässingsvatten">  <i>mässingsvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dopvatten">       <i>dopvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="blodvatten">      <i>blodvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
